Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202572-232.02
School lands; administration costs; payment; cash fund.

The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall pay the costs of administering the unsold school lands out of receipts from school land income. A cash fund is hereby authorized and the State Treasurer shall, out of the receipts for school land income, deposit in such cash fund that amount appropriated by the Legislature for each fiscal year on the first day of each fiscal year. Beginning October 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025, any investment earnings from investment of money in the cash fund shall be credited to the General Fund. Beginning on July 1, 2025, any investment earnings from investment of the money in the cash fund shall be credited to the Education Future Fund.

Laws 1967, c. 459, § 1, p. 1429;

Laws 1978, LB 460, § 1;

Laws 2024, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 26;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 153.